Utah statutes.
67-4a-801.   Interstate agreements and cooperation -- Joint and reciprocal
actions with other states.
(1) (a)  The administrator may enter into agreements with other states to
exchange information needed to enable Utah or another state to audit or
otherwise determine unclaimed property that Utah or another state may be
entitled to subject to a claim of custody.
(b)  The administrator may:
(i)  require the reporting of information needed to enable compliance with
agreements made under this section; and
(ii)  prescribe the form for reporting that information.
(2)  The administrator may join with other states to seek enforcement of this
chapter against any person who is or may be holding property reportable under
this chapter.
(3)  At the request of another state, the attorney general of Utah may bring
an action in the name of the administrator of the other state in any court of
competent jurisdiction to enforce the unclaimed property laws of the other
state against a holder in this state of property subject to escheat or a claim
of abandonment by the other state, if the other state has agreed to pay
expenses incurred by the attorney general in bringing the action.
(4) (a)  The administrator may request that the attorney general of another
state or any other person bring an action in the name of the administrator in
the other state.
(b)  The administrator shall pay all expenses including attorney's fees in any
action under this subsection.
(c)  The administrator may agree to pay the person bringing the action
attorney's fees based in whole or in part on a percentage of the value of any
property recovered in the action.
(d)  The administrator may not deduct any expenses paid under this subsection
from the amount that is subject to the claim by the owner under this chapter.
